en: Saccharina japonica
de: Japanischer Blatttang
hr: saharina japonica
la: Saccharina japonica, Laminaria Japonica

en: Laminaria
de: Laminaria
fr: Laminaire
hr: laminarija
it: laminaria
la: Laminaria

en: wakame
xx: wakame
ar: واكامي
de: wakame
eo: Vakameo
es: wakame, alga wakame
fa: واکامه
fr: wakamé
he: ואקאמה
ja: ワカメ
ko: 미역
la: undaria pinnatifida
ru: вакамэ
th: วะกะเมะ
vi: Tảo bẹ Undaria
zh: 海帶芽

en: Irish moss, Carrageen moss, irishmoss, sea moss
it: muschio irlandese
la: Chondrus crispus

en: seaweed caviar
da: tangkaviar
sv: tångkaviar, tångcaviar

en: koji, kōji, koji culture, koji spores, koji starter
xx: A. Oryzae, koji
ar: رشاشية أوريزه
de: Koji, Koji-Ferment, Koji-Pilzkultur
es: koji, fermento koji
fr: koji, ferment Koji
ja: ニホンコウジカビ
ko: 누룩곰팡이
pl: koji
zh: 米曲菌, 米麴菌

en: rice koji
fr: koji de riz
it: riso koji
ja: 米こうじ

en: tegument
de: Integument
eo: Tegumento
fr: téguments
hr: sjemena opna
it: tegumento
nl: integument
ru: Тегумент
sv: integument

en: mushroom, edible fungi
an: Potrecón
ar: عيش الغراب
ba: Ашарға яраҡлы бәшмәктәр
bg: гъба, гъби
bi: Sompiniong
bn: মাশরুম
bs: Gljiva
ca: bolet , bolet comestible
co: Funzu
cs: jedlá houbacy:Madarchen
da: Spiselige svampe, Svampe
de: Pilz, Pilze, Speisepilz, Speisepilze
el: Μανιτάρι
eo: manĝebla fungo
es: seta, champinon, champiñon, champiñones
et: Söögiseen, seen, seened
eu: ziza, Ziza jangarri
fa: قارچ خوراکی, قارچ چتری
fi: sieni, ruokasieni
fr: champignon, champignons
fy: Poddestoel
ga: Beacán
gd: Balgan-buachair
gl: Cogomelo
hi: खाद्य खुम्ब, कुकुरमुत्ता
hr: jestive gljive
hu: ehető gomba
hy: սունկ
ia: champignon
id: Jamur, Jamur pangan
ik: Argaiġñaq
io: Fungo
is: Ætisveppir, Stórsveppir
it: fungo, fungi
ja: キノコ, 食用キノコ, きのこ
jv: Jamur, Jamur pangan
kk: Жейтін саңырауқұлақтар
kn: ಅಣಬೆ
ko: 버섯, 식용 버섯
ku: Kuvark
ky: Козу карын
la: Fungus
ln: Likombó
lt: Valgomieji grybai, Vaisiakūnis
lv: sēne , Ēdamās sēnes
mk: печурка , јадлива печурка
ml: കൂൺ
mn: Мөөг
mr: मशरूम
ms: Cendawan
nb: matsopp
ne: च्याउ
nl: paddenstoel, paddestoel, paddestoelen, zwam
nn: matsopp
nv: Ábishjaaʼ
or: ଛତୁ
pa: ਖੁੰਭ
pl: grzyby jadalne, owocnik, grzyb, grzyby, grzybów, grzybowy, grzybowe, grzybowa
pt: cogumelo , cogumelo comestível
qu: K'allampa puquy
ro: ciupercă , Ciuperci comestibile
ru: гриб, съедобный гриб
sa: छत्राकम्
sd: کُنڀِِي
sh: Jestiva gljiva, Pečurka
si: හතු
sl: Goba
so: Boqoshaa
sq: Këpurdhat
sr: Јестиве гљиве, печурка
su: Fungi
sv: svamp, matsvampar
sw: Uyoga
ta: காளான்
te: పుట్ట గొడుగు , పుట్టగొడుగుల పెంపకం
tg: Занбурӯғ
th: เห็ด
tl: Kabute
to: Fakamaluʻatēvolo
ug: مور
uk: гриб, Їстівні гриби
ur: کھمبی
vi: Nấm ăn, Nấm lớn
vo: Söögisiin
wa: Magnåve tchampion, Tchampion-åbusson
yi: שוועמל
zh: 食用蕈, 蕈類

en: mushroom proteins
de: Pilzprotein
fr: protéine de champignon
hr: proteini gljiva
it: proteine dei funghi

en: mixed mushrooms
de: gemischte Pilze, Pilzmischung
es: mezcla de setas
hr: miješane gljive
it: misto funghi

en: forest mushroom
de: Waldpilze
fr: champignon forestier, champignons forestiers, champignon des bois, champignons des bois
hr: šumska gljiva
it: funghi di bosco
nl: bospaddenstoel
pl: grzyby leśne, grzybów leśnych

en: Greek-style marinated mushrooms
fr: Champignons à la grecque

en: concentrated mushroom juice
de: Pilz-Saftkonzentrat, Pilz Saftkonzentrat
es: zumo de champiñón concentrado, jugo de champiñón concentrado
fi: sienimehutiiviste
fr: jus de champignon concentré, jus concentré de champignon
hr: koncentrirani sok od gljiva
it: succo concentrato di funghi

en: mushroom extract
cs: houbový extrakt
de: Pilzextrakt
es: extracto de champiñón
fi: sieniuute, herkkusieniuute
fr: extrait de champignon, extrait de champignons
hr: ekstrakt gljive
it: estratto di funghi, estratti di funghi
nl: champignonextract, paddestoelenextract
pl: ekstrakt grzybowy, ekstrakt z grzybów
sv: svampextrakt, champinjonextrakt

en: mushroom powder
de: Champignonpulver
es: hongos en polvo, polvo de hongos, polvo de setas, setas en polvo
fi: sienijauhe
fr: poudre de champignon
hr: gljiva u prahu
it: polvere di funghi
nl: champignonpoeder
sv: champinjonpulver

en: Cantharellus, cantharelle
xx: Cantharellus
de: Pfifferlinge
pl: Pieprznik

en: golden chanterelle, cantharellus cibarius
ar: فطر الشانتريل
be: лісічка сапраўдная
bg: пачи крак
ca: rossinyol
co: Ghjalletta
cs: liška obecná
cy: Siantrel
da: Almindelig Kantarel
de: Echter Pfifferling, cantharellus cibarius
el: Κανθαρέλλα
eo: Kantarelo
es: Chantarela
et: kukeseen, harilik kukeseen
eu: Zizahori
fa: قارچ قیفی
fi: keltavahvero
fr: girolles, Cantharellus cibarius, Girolle, Girole
ga: Cantarnaid
gl: Cantarela
hr: lisička
hu: Sárga rókagomba
id: Jamur chanterelle
io: Kantarelo
is: Kantarella
it: Gallinaccio
ja: アンズタケ
ka: მიქლიო
ko: 꾀꼬리버섯
la: Cantharellus cibarius
lt: Valgomoji voveraitė
lv: Parastā gailene
mk: лисичарка
nb: Kantarell
nl: cantharel, c
nn: Kantarell
pl: Pieprznik jadalny, kurka, kurki, pieprznik pospolity
ro: Gălbior
ru: лисичка обыкновенная
se: Kantarella
sk: Kuriatko jedlé
sl: Navadna lisička
sr: Lisičarka
sv: Kantarell
tr: Yumurta mantarı
uk: лисичка справжня
vi: Nấm mồng gà
vo: Kikkasiin
zh: 鸡油菇

en: boletus
xx: Boletus
fr: bolet
pl: borowik, borowiki, borowika

en: cep, porcini mushroom, porcini mushrooms, Boletus edulis
ar: بوليط مأكول
ba: Аҡ бәшмәк
be: Баравік
bg: обикновена манатарка
bn: বোলেটাস এডুলাস
bs: Vrganj
ca: cep
cs: hřib smrkový
cv: Шур кăмпа
cy: Wicsen gron
da: Karl Johan
de: Steinpilze, Boletus edulis
el: Βωλίτης ο εδώδιμος
es: boletus, seta común, Boletus edulis
et: kivipuravik, harilik kivipuravik
eu: Onddozuri
fa: قارچ تیره‌سر
fi: Herkkutatti, Boletus edulis
fr: cèpe, cèpes, bolets, cèpe de Bordeaux, Boletus edulis
ga: Ceap
gl: Andoa
he: פורצ'יני
hr: ljetni vrganj, vrganji, Boletus edulis
hu: Ízletes vargánya
hy: Սպիտակ սունկ
io: Cepo
is: Kóngssveppur
it: funghi porcini, Boletus edulis
ja: ヤマドリタケ
ka: დათვისსოკო
kk: Ақ саңырауқұлақ
ku: Fîqeroş
la: Boletus edulis
lt: Tikrinis baravykas
lv: Egļu baravika
mk: летен вргањ
nb: Steinsopp
nl: eekhoorntjesbrood
nn: steinsopp
oc: Boletus edulis
pl: Borowik szlachetny, prawdziwek, prawdziwki
ro: Hrib
ru: Белый гриб
sh: Vrganj
sk: hríb smrekový
sl: Jesenski goban
sr: вргањ
sv: Stensopp, karljohan
th: เห็ดพอร์ชินี
tr: Çörek mantarı
tt: Ак гөмбә
uk: Білий гриб
vi: Nấm thông
wa: Magnåve bolet
zh: 美味牛肝菌